Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.360

Revenue bonds—Authorized purposes.

All such revenue bonds authorized under the terms of this chapter may be issued and sold by the district from time to time and in such amounts as is deemed necessary by the board of park and recreation commissioners of each district to provide sufficient funds for the carrying out of all district powers, without limiting the generality thereof, including the following: Acquisition; construction; reconstruction; maintenance; repair; additions; operations of recreational facilities; parking facilities as a part of a recreational facility; and any other district purpose from which revenues can be derived. Included in the costs thereof shall be any necessary engineering, inspection, accounting, fiscal, and legal expenses, the cost of issuance of bonds, including printing, engraving and advertising and other similar expenses, and the proceeds of such bond issue are hereby made available for all such purposes.

[ 1972 ex.s. c 94 s 4.]

NOTES:

Alternative authority to issue revenue bonds: RCW 39.46.150, 39.46.160.

Funds for reserve purposes may be included in issue amount: RCW 39.44.140.